Mississippi, session 2026, HB366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Legislature declares that it is the policy of this state that all forms of discrimination in the criminal justice system are prohibited in the State of Mississippi. (2)  In furtherance of this policy, the following state and local governmental entities shall take such measures as may be necessary to assure that the activities and environment of the entity are free of discrimination: (a)  The Office of the Attorney General; (b)  The Department of Public Safety; (c)  Mississippi Department of Corrections; (d)  The State Parole Board; (e)  Other state agencies having employees vested with the powers of law enforcement in conducting investigations and making arrests for alleged violations of criminal offenses; (f)  All courts of this state; (g)  The offices of the district attorneys and other prosecutors; (h)  The offices of public defenders; (i)  Law enforcement agencies; and (j)  Mental health agencies. (3)  The administrative head of each entity listed or described under subsection (2) of this section shall ensure that all employees of those entities are educated and provided proper training in state and federal antidiscrimination laws so that persons belonging to a protected class who are involved with the criminal justice system are afforded equal treatment and opportunities in a nondiscriminatory manner.  Each entity shall implement workplace policies prohibiting discriminatory actions which set forth clear expectations of employees when interacting with persons involved in the criminal justice system and consequences for violations of those policies. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.